District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.107

Foreign corporations — Change of registered office or registered agent.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 222, ch. 269, § 107
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 85-254, § 24
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 242, Pub. L. 86-106, § 14
Sept. 3, 1963, 77 Stat. 137, Pub. L. 88-111, § 1(7)
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(nn)-(qq), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.107.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.8.
1973 Ed., § 29-933h.